Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 4. Revenue Bonds.

Sec. 29.47.240.
Revenue bonds.

A municipality may issue negotiable or nonnegotiable revenue bonds for a public enterprise or public corporation of the municipality where the only security is the revenue of the public enterprise or corporation.

A municipality may issue its revenue bonds to finance the purchase of residential mortgage loans. The revenue bonds issued under this subsection are payable solely from the principal and interest of the mortgage loans and from other amounts pledged by the municipality, except the pledge of revenues derived from taxes. Revenue bonds issued under this subsection do not constitute a general obligation of the municipality.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.250.
No election required.

An election is not required to authorize the issuance and sale of revenue bonds, unless otherwise provided by ordinance.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.260.
Applicability of AS 37.10.085.

The prohibitions of AS

37.10.085

do not apply to the issuance of revenue bonds or the use of proceeds from revenue bonds by a home rule or general law municipality.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)